Massachusetts, session 194th, H685.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 74 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following section:
SECTION 58. Subject to appropriation, the board of education shall establish and
maintain a program to support training and education programs that prepare vocational school
students for employment in high-demand occupations as part of a robust and diverse clean
energy workforce with the goal of providing existing students enhanced career guidance,
professional and job readiness training, and matchmaking with employers to help meet the
workforce and talent pipeline needs of employers in the clean energy and climatetech economy.
In establishing and maintaining said program, the board of higher education shall solicit input
from local public and vocational school authorities, postsecondary technical schools and the
board of trustees of community colleges.
of 4

There shall be, subject to appropriation, a grant program to implement this section to
which employers shall have access to:
(i) identify, support or establish collaborative regional partnerships including, but not
limited to, employers, workforce development and education organizations, regional economic
development organizations established pursuant to sections 3J and 3K of chapter 23A and
regional economic development officials;
(ii) prepare vocational school students for employment in high-demand occupations as
part of a robust and diverse clean energy and climatetech workforce
(iii) improve and increase employment opportunities in the clean energy and climatetech
industry for low-income individuals, women and minorities, and environmental justice
populations;
(iv) provide training and educational or career ladder services for employed or
unemployed clean energy and climatetech workers who are seeking new positions or
responsibilities within the clean energy and climatetech industry;
(v) increase support for internship and apprentice training;
(vi) boost industry-relevant instructor capacity for high school and postsecondary
programs; and
(vii) direct support for succession planning, worker retention and upskilling strategies for
older and incumbent workers.
For the purposes of the grant program, "eligible applicants'' shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) employers and employer associations; (ii) local workforce investment boards; (iii)
of 4

institutions of higher education; (iv) kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, and vocational
education institutions; (v) private for-profit and nonprofit organizations providing education and
workforce training; (vi) private for-profit and nonprofit organizations without an established
education and workforce training program, provided they partner with vocational education
institutions(vii) 1-stop career centers; (viii) local workforce development entities; and (ix) any
partnership or collaboration between eligible applicants. Any funds allocated through the
program shall complement and not replace existing local, state, private or federal funding for
training and educational programs.
A grant proposal submitted pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) a plan that defines specific goals for clean energy and climatetech workforce training
and educational improvements;
(ii) the evidence-based programs the applicant shall use to meet the goals;
(iii) a budget necessary to implement the plan, including a detailed description of any
funding or in-kind contributions that an applicant will be providing in support of the proposal;
(iv) any other private funding or private sector participation that the applicant
anticipates in support of the proposal; and
(v) the proposed number of individuals who would be enrolled, complete training and be
placed into employment in the targeted industries.
The board of education shall, in consultation with the executive office of economic
development, executive office of education, executive office of labor and workforce
development, the department of education, the Massachusetts Association of Vocational
of 4

Administrators, the Massachusetts Clean Energy Center, and entities representing parties who
are eligible to participate in the grant program, develop guidelines for an annual review of the
progress being made by each grantee. A grantee shall participate in any evaluation or
accountability process implemented by or authorized by the commonwealth corporation. The
board shall file annual reports for the duration of the programs with the chairs of the house and
senate committee on ways and means, the chairs of the joint committee on labor and workforce
development, the chairs of the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities, and energy, and
the chairs of the joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies not later
than January 1; provided, however, that the report shall include an overview of the activities of
the programs, the number of participants in the programs and the employment outcomes in the
programs.
of 4